Washington statutes.
RCW 35.39.110

City retirement system—Investment advisory committee—Liability of members.

No member of the investment advisory committee is liable for the negligence, default, or failure of any other person or other member of the committee to perform the duties of his or her office, and no member of the committee may be considered or held to be an insurer of the funds or assets of the retirement system nor shall any member be liable for actions performed with the exercise of reasonable diligence within the scope of his or her duly authorized activities as a member of the committee.

[ 1982 c 166 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1982 c 166: See note following RCW 35.39.060.